Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1
GENERAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

40-2-101. Creation - appointment - term - subject to termination - repeal of part.

A public utilities commission is created in the department of regulatory agencies, which is known as the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado. The public utilities commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The public utilities commission consists of three members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. Persons holding office on July 1, 1993, shall continue to serve in such office, but the term of one of these persons shall expire on the Monday preceding the second Tuesday of January, 1995, of another, the Monday preceding the second Tuesday of January, 1996, and of the third, the Monday preceding the second Tuesday of January, 1997, all as the governor shall designate; except that such designation shall not result in the extension of the term of any member to more than four years' duration. Thereafter, appointments shall be made for terms of four years.

No more than two members of the public utilities commission shall be affiliated with the same political party, and any appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. Each commissioner shall be a qualified elector of this state. The governor shall designate one member of the commission as chair of the commission. The commissioners shall devote their entire time to the duties of their office to the exclusion of any other employment and shall receive such compensation as is designated by law. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of its business.

The provisions of section 24-34-104, C.R.S., concerning the termination schedule for regulatory bodies of the state unless extended as provided in that section, are applicable to the public utilities commission created by this section.

This part 1 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.

Before the repeal, the public utilities commission is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 465, § 4.

C.L.

§ 2915.

CSA:

C. 137, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-1.

L. 69:

p. 928, § 2.

L. 76:

(3) added, p. 627, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 914, § 31, effective June 15.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 691, § 71, effective April 20.

L. 93:

(1) and (3)(b) amended, p. 2057, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(b) amended, p. 404, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(b) amended, p. 731, § 3, effective March 20; (2) amended, p. 1698, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2008:

(3)(b)(I) amended, p. 1791, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(3)(b)(I) amended, (HB 18-1270), ch. 360, p. 2153, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3290, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3398, § 141, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For salaries of commissioners, see § 24-9-102; for the powers and duties of the public utilities commission in regard to motor vehicle carriers, see article 10.1 of this title.

(2) For the short title ("Energy Storage Procurement Act") in HB 18-1270, see section 1 of chapter 360, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

40-2-102. Oath - qualifications.

Each commissioner, before entering upon the duties of his office, shall take the constitutional oath of office. No person in the employ of or holding any official relation to any corporation or person, which said corporation or person is subject in whole or in part to regulation by the commission, and no person owning stocks or bonds of any such corporation or who is in any manner pecuniarily interested therein shall be appointed to or hold the office of commissioner or be appointed or employed by the commission; but if any such person becomes the owner of such stocks or bonds or becomes pecuniarily interested in such corporation otherwise than voluntarily, he shall divest himself of such ownership or interest within six months; failing to do so, his office or employment shall become vacant.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 466, § 5.

C.L.

§ 2916.

CSA:

C. 137, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-2.

L. 69:

p. 928, § 3.

Cross references:

For the oath of office, see § 8 of article XII of the Colorado Constitution.

40-2-103. Director - duties.

The executive director of the department of regulatory agencies, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, and with the approval of the commission, shall appoint a director of the commission. The director shall manage the operations of the agency in order to carry out the public utilities law, to carry out and implement policies, procedures, and decisions made by the commission, and to meet the requirements of the commission concerning any matters within the authority of a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and which requirements are under the jurisdiction of the commission. The director has all the powers and responsibilities of the division director for this purpose, including the power to issue all necessary process, writs, warrants, and notices. The director has the requisite power to serve warrants and other process in any county or city and county of this state and to delegate such actions to duly authorized employees or agents of the agency as appropriate.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 466, § 6.

C.L.

§ 2917.

CSA:

C. 137, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-3.

L. 69:

p. 928, § 4.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1524, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2057, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1027), ch. 83, p. 267, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(2) repealed, (SB 17-044), ch. 4, p. 7, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3399, § 142, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

40-2-104. Assistants and employees - utilization of independent experts.

The director of the commission may appoint such experts, engineers, statisticians, accountants, investigative personnel, clerks, and other employees as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this title or to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by law upon the commission.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 2058, § 6, effective July 1, 1993.)

The director of the commission shall hire and designate employees of the commission as administrative law judges who shall have the power to administer oaths, examine witnesses, receive evidence, and conduct hearings, investigations, and other proceedings on behalf of the commission.

Of the money that the commission receives from the public utilities commission fixed utility fund pursuant to section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(II), up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars per year may be allocated to personal services contracts with outside consultants and experts that meet criteria specified by the commission.

The amount allocated for outside consultants and experts pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section shall be adjusted annually in accordance with changes in the United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its successor index.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 466, § 7.

C.L.

§ 2918.

CSA:

C. 137, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-4.

L. 69:

p. 928, § 5.

L. 89:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1524, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2058, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) added, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1156, § 1, effective June 10.

40-2-104.5. Financial disclosures by intervenors.

An intervenor in any matter before the commission shall disclose any of the following relationships that exist or, within the immediately preceding twenty-four months, existed between the intervenor and the regulated utility in the matter:

Any corporate affiliation with the regulated utility;

The receipt of any funding from the regulated utility; or

Any other financial relationship between the intervenor and the regulated utility.

The commission shall publish on its website all disclosures made pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1156, § 2, effective June 10.

40-2-105. Office - sessions - seal - supplies.

The office of the commission shall be in the city and county of Denver. The office shall be open every day, legal holidays, Saturdays, and Sundays excepted. Hearings under this title may be held in such places within this state as shall be determined by the commission. It is the duty of the office of state planning and budgeting to provide suitable quarters for the commission and its employees.

The commission shall have a seal bearing the following inscription: "The public utilities commission of the state of Colorado". The seal shall be affixed to all writs and authentications of copies of records and to such other instruments as the commission shall direct. All courts shall take judicial notice of said seal.

Necessary expenses of the commission shall be paid from appropriations made by the general assembly to the commission.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 467, § 8.

C.L.

§ 2919.

CSA:

C. 137, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-5.

L. 69:

p. 929, § 6.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 821, § 18, effective July 18.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1525, § 4, effective April 12.

Cross references:

For legal holidays, see article 11 of title 24; for payment of expenses, see § 40-2-107.

40-2-106. Reports and decisions of the commission.

Whenever an investigation is made, a hearing is held, or a decision is entered by the commission, it is the duty of the commission to make a report or decision in writing in respect thereto which shall state its findings of fact and conclusions thereon, together with its decision or requirement in the premises. All such reports and decisions shall be entered of record and a copy thereof shall be furnished to all parties to the proceedings and to such other persons as the commission may deem advisable.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 467, § 9.

C.L.

§ 2920.

CSA:

C. 137, § 10.

L. 45:

p. 525, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-6.

L. 69:

p. 929, § 7.

40-2-107. Compensation and expenses of employees.

All employees of the commission shall receive such compensation as may be fixed pursuant to law.

Repealed.

All expenses incurred by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this title, including the actual and necessary traveling expenses and other expenses and disbursements of the commissioners, their officers, and employees shall be paid by the controller from the funds appropriated for the use of the commission upon vouchers of the commission therefor.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 468, § 10.

C.L.

§ 2921.

CSA:

C. 137, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-7.

L. 69:

p. 930, § 8.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 1525, § 5, effective April 12.

L. 93:

(2) repealed, p. 2058, § 7, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For appropriations, see part 1 of article 75 of title 24.

40-2-108. Rules - definitions - legislative declaration.

The commission shall promulgate such rules as are necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this title and shall furnish, without charge, copies of the appropriate rules to each public utility under its jurisdiction and, upon request, to any public officer, agency, political subdivision, association of officers, agencies, or political subdivisions and to any representative of twenty-five or more consumers. The commission shall be governed by the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., for the promulgation and adoption of rules; except that, notwithstanding any provision of the said article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to the contrary, the commission shall issue a decision whenever it adopts rules in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding section 24-4-103 (6), C.R.S., any temporary or emergency rule adopted by the commission shall be effective until a permanent rule that replaces the temporary or emergency rule is effective but not for more than two hundred ten days after the date of adoption.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

Certain communities, both in Colorado and internationally, have historically been forced to bear a disproportionate burden of adverse human health or environmental effects, as documented in numerous studies, including the "Toxic Wastes and Race at Twenty, 1987-2007" report by the United Church of Christ Justice & Witness Ministries; the federal environmental protection agency's annual environmental justice progress reports; and a 2021 report from the "Mapping for Environmental Justice" project at the Berkeley Public Policy/The Goldman School that shows how the pollution burden is distributed in Colorado, while also facing systemic exclusion from environmental decision-making processes and enjoying fewer environmental benefits; and

The purpose of this subsection (3) is to ensure that the commission, in exercising its regulatory authority, will take account of and, where possible, help to correct these historical inequities.

The commission shall promulgate rules requiring that the commission, in all of its work including its review of all filings and its determination of all adjudications, consider how best to provide equity, minimize impacts, and prioritize benefits to disproportionately impacted communities and address historical inequalities.

In promulgating rules pursuant to this subsection (3), the commission shall identify disproportionately impacted communities. In identifying the communities, the commission shall consider minority, low-income, tribal, or indigenous populations in the state that experience disproportionate environmental harm and risks resulting from such factors as increased vulnerability to environmental degradation, lack of opportunity for public participation, or other factors. Increased vulnerability may be attributable to an accumulation of negative or a lack of positive environmental, health, economic, or social conditions within these populations.

When making decisions relating to retail customer programs, the commission shall host informational meetings, workshops, and hearings that invite input from disproportionately impacted communities and shall ensure, to the extent reasonably possible, that such programs, including any associated incentives and other relevant investments, include floor expenditures, set aside as equity budgets, to ensure that low-income customers and disproportionately impacted communities will have at least proportionate access to the benefits of such programs, incentives, and investments.

As used in this subsection (3):

"Cost-burdened" means a household that spends more than thirty percent of its income on housing.

"Disproportionately impacted community" means a community that is in a census block group, as determined in accordance with the most recent United States census, where the proportion of households that are low income is greater than forty percent, the proportion of households that identify as minority is greater than forty percent, or the proportion of households that are housing cost-burdened is greater than forty percent; or is any other community as identified or approved by a state agency, if:

The community has a history of environmental racism perpetuated through redlining, anti-Indigenous, anti-immigrant, anti-Hispanic, or anti-Black laws; or

The community is one where multiple factors, including socioeconomic stressors, disproportionate environmental burdens, vulnerability to environmental degradation, and lack of public participation, may act cumulatively to affect health and the environment and contribute to persistent disparities.

"Low income" means meeting one or more of the following criteria:

Median household income less than or equal to two hundred percent of the federal poverty guideline;

Median household income less than or equal to eighty percent of the area median income; or

Qualification under income guidelines adopted by the department of human services pursuant to section 40-8.5-105.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 468, § 12.

C.L.

§ 2923.

CSA:

C. 137, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-9.

L. 64:

p. 166, § 124.

L. 69:

p. 930, § 9.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1525, § 6, effective April 12.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2058, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 232, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1157, § 3, effective June 10.

40-2-109. Report to executive director of the department of revenue.

Repealed.

On March 1 of each year, the public utilities commission shall furnish the executive director of the department of revenue with a list of those public utilities subject to its jurisdiction, supervision, and regulation on January 1 of each year. The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to:

Motor carriers subject to the passenger-mile tax imposed by sections 42-3-304 and 42-3-306, so long as the cost of regulation of such motor carriers is defrayed from the proceeds of such passenger-mile tax; and

Rail fixed guideway systems that are regulated by the public utilities commission pursuant to part 1 of article 18 of this title.

The director of the public utilities commission shall provide written notice to the revisor of statutes once the federal grant moneys made available under the "Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5329, have been awarded to the state. This subsection (2) takes effect upon the receipt by the revisor of statutes of such written notice.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 695, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-10.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1597, § 14, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2570, § 93, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1184, § 37, effective August 8.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 419, § 14, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1103), ch. 96, p. 309, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

(2)(a)(I) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1723, § 85, effective May 29.

40-2-109.5. Incentives for distributed generation - definition.

The commission shall develop a policy to establish incentives for consumers who produce distributed generation, including, but not limited to, small wind turbines, thermal biomass, electric biomass, and solar thermal energy. The commission shall consider whether a credit program similar to the renewable energy standard set forth in section 40-2-124 would work for consumers who produce distributed generation. The commission shall present the policy and findings regarding a credit program to the house of representatives transportation and energy committee and the senate agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee, or their successor committees.

As used in this section, "distributed generation" means a system by which a consumer generates heat or electricity using renewable energy resources for his or her own needs and may also send surplus electrical power back into the power grid.

Effective January 1, 2012, all photovoltaic installations funded wholly or partially through financial incentives under this section shall be subject to the requirements set forth in section 40-2-128.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1761, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (HB 10-1001), ch. 37, p. 154, § 7, effective August 11.

40-2-110. Appropriation and fees.

At each regular session, the general assembly shall determine the amounts to be expended by the public utilities commission for its administrative expenses in supervising and regulating the public utilities which are under its jurisdiction, a list of which the commission is required by section 40-2-109 to furnish to the department of revenue, and shall appropriate to the public utilities commission from the public utilities commission fixed utility fund, established in section 40-2-114, the full amount so determined, and such amount shall be defrayed out of the fees to be paid by such public utilities, as provided in section 40-2-112.

At each regular session, the general assembly shall determine the amounts to be expended by the public utilities commission for its administrative expenses in the supervision and regulation of motor carriers as provided by law and shall appropriate such amounts from the public utilities commission motor carrier fund established in section 40-2-110.5 as are necessary to be expended by the commission to accomplish said purposes.
(2) (a) (I) At each regular session, the general assembly shall determine the amounts to be expended by the public utilities commission for its administrative expenses in the supervision and regulation of motor carriers as provided by law and shall appropriate such amounts from the public utilities commission motor carrier fund established in section 40-2-110.5 as are necessary to be expended by the commission to accomplish said purposes.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 695, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-11.

L. 57:

p. 599, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-11.

L. 69:

p. 930, § 10.

L. 82:

(2) amended, p. 584, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(a)(II) and (2)(b)(II) amended, p. 1295, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(a)(I) amended and (2)(a)(II) and (2)(b) repealed, pp. 1351, 1352, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1.

40-2-110.5. Annual fees - public utilities commission motor carrier fund - created.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 419, § 15, effective August 10, 2011.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2380, § 2, effective August 6, 2003.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 2059, § 9, effective July 1, 1993.)

(2.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 31, § 1, effective August 8, 2005.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 419, § 15, effective August 10, 2011.)

The public utilities commission motor carrier fund is hereby created in the state treasurer's office. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the purposes specified in section 40-2-110 (2)(a)(I). Any unexpended balance remaining in said fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund.

(6.5) and (7) Repealed.

(8) Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in section 40-10.1-111, the commission by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the commission by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

(9) (a) For the 2013-14 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, if the amount of uncommitted reserves in the motor carrier fund at the conclusion of any given fiscal year exceeds ten percent of the fund's expenditures during that fiscal year, the amount of the excess that is attributable to revenues received from any motor carrier, motor private carrier, broker, freight forwarder, leasing company, or any other person required to register with the United States department of transportation under the unified carrier registration system as authorized by federal law and as provided for in section 40-10.5-102 shall be transferred to the motor carrier safety fund created in section 42-4-235 (6), C.R.S.

(b) The distribution required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (9) is in lieu of, and shall supersede, any provision to the contrary in section 24-75-402, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 585, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) and (2) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1548, § 1, effective June 1; (2.5) amended, p. 2056, § 38, effective October 14.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 1034, § 1, effective April 2; (1) and (2) amended, p. 1051, § 4, effective April 12.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1308, § 4, effective May 29; (7) amended, p. 1295, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3) and (6) amended and (7) repealed, pp. 1351, 1352, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1; (3) repealed, p. 1351, § 2, effective July 1, 1989.

L. 93:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 2059, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1211, § 27, effective May 31.

L. 98:

(8) added, p. 1348, § 86, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(6.5) added, p. 458, § 20, effective March 5; (1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 2380, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2.5) amended, p. 31, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(6.5) repealed and (9) added, pp. 1102, 1094, §§ 24, 4, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1792, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1981, § 119, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1), (4), (5), and (8) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 419, § 15, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(9)(a) amended, (HB 14-1081), ch. 8, p. 90, § 1, effective February 27.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) by Senate Bill 84-85 and House Bill 84-1252 were harmonized.

40-2-111. Report of utilities to department of revenue.

Each public utility required to pay such fees shall, on or before May 15 of each year, file a return with the department of revenue on such forms as shall be prescribed by the executive director of the department of revenue and the public utilities commission setting forth the gross operating revenues of such public utility from intrastate utility business only transacted in the state of Colorado during the preceding calendar year. Such return shall be executed and verified by two of the executive officers of the utility making the return and shall contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, and any officer who knowingly and willfully makes and signs a false return is guilty of perjury in the second degree.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 166, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-12.

L. 69:

p. 964, § 75.

L. 72:

p. 565, § 39.

Cross references:

For perjury in the second degree, see § 18-8-503.

40-2-112. Computation of fees.

On or before June 1 of each year, the executive director of the department of revenue shall ascertain the aggregate amount of gross operating revenues of all public utilities filing returns as provided in section 40-2-111. The executive director shall then compute the percentage which the full amount determined by the general assembly for administrative expenses of the public utilities commission for the supervision and regulation of such public utilities is of the aggregate amount of gross operating revenues of such public utilities derived from intrastate utility business transacted during the preceding calendar year, and the percentage so computed shall be the basis upon which fees for the ensuing year shall be fixed.

In recognition of the fact that nonprofit generation and transmission electric corporations or associations may be subject to less regulation and to no rate regulation by the commission, the executive director of the department of revenue shall disregard any revenues reported by such entities in making the computations required under subsection (1) of this section. In addition, the executive director of the department of revenue shall, in consultation with the director of the commission, enter into an agreement with each nonprofit generation and transmission electric corporation or association whereby such entity agrees to pay an amount equal to the administrative expenses reasonably anticipated to be incurred by the commission for the regulation of such entity. Said agreement shall be made by May 1 of the year in which it is to become effective and shall remain effective for not less than two and not more than five years. In the event that the anticipated amount set forth in the agreement proves to be substantially higher or lower than the commission's actual expenses incurred, the agreement for the next following year or years shall be adjusted so as to take such fact into account. If no such agreement is made as provided in this subsection (2), the commission, on its own motion or upon application by the executive director of the department of revenue or by such entity, shall set the matter for hearing and determine the amount to be paid by the entity. Amounts paid under agreements as contemplated by this subsection (2) or by order of the commission shall be used to reduce amounts paid by other utilities under subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 696, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-13.

L. 57:

p. 599, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-13.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2060, § 10, effective July 1.

40-2-113. Collection of fees - limitation.

On or before June 15 of each year, the department of revenue shall notify each public utility subject to this article 2 of the amount of its fee for the ensuing fiscal year beginning July 1, computed by multiplying its gross intrastate utility operating revenues for the preceding calendar year, as set forth in its return filed for that purpose, by the percentage determined in accordance with section 40-2-112; except that the department of revenue shall not require a public utility that is a telephone corporation to pay a fee in excess of two-fifths of one percent of its gross intrastate utility operating revenues for the preceding calendar year and shall not require any other public utility to pay a fee in excess of forty-five one-hundredths of one percent of its gross intrastate utility operating revenues for the preceding calendar year.

Each public utility, including penal communications service providers, as defined in section 17-42-103 (2), shall pay the fee assessed against it to the department of revenue in equal quarterly installments on or before July 15, October 15, January 15, and April 15 in each fiscal year. If a public utility does not make a payment by one of the quarterly deadlines, the department of revenue shall charge the public utility a penalty of ten percent of the installment due, together with interest at the rate of one percent per month on the amount of the unpaid installment until the full amount of the installment, penalty, and interest has been paid. Upon failure, refusal, or neglect of any public utility to pay the fee, or any penalty or interest, the attorney general shall bring suit in the name of the state to collect the amount due.

The commission shall allow a public utility that is not a telephone corporation full recovery of fees assessed and remitted to the department of revenue pursuant to this section. The recovery mechanism must include the ability of the utility, at its option, to use a deferred account to track changes in fees between rate proceedings.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 696, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-14.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1372), ch. 247, p. 906, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1158, § 4, effective June 10; entire section amended, (HB 21-1201), ch. 389, p. 2599, § 3, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by SB 21-272 and HB 21-1201 were harmonized.

40-2-114. Disposition of fees collected - telecommunications utility fund - fixed utility fund.

Three percent of the fees collected under section 40-2-113 by the department of revenue shall be remitted to the state treasurer and credited by the state treasurer as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (a), for the 2016-17 fiscal year and for any fiscal year thereafter in which a grant match is required for the receipt of federal money under the federal "Moving Ahead for Progress in the 21st Century Act", Pub.L. 112-141, 126 Stat. 405, for rail fixed guideway system safety oversight responsibilities under article 18 of this title, the lesser of all of the fees or up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars of the fees, or as much thereof as the commission deems necessary, to the public utilities commission fixed utility fund created in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1);

For the 2017-18 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the lesser of all of the fees remaining after fees are credited as required by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) or an amount of the fees equal to two hundred forty thousand dollars plus a cumulative inflation adjustment of two percent for each fiscal year beginning with the 2017-18 fiscal year to the highway-rail crossing signalization fund created in section 40-29-116 (1); and

Any remaining fees to the general fund.

For the remaining ninety-seven percent of the fees collected, the state treasurer shall credit:

Fees paid by public utilities that are telephone corporations to the telecommunications utility fund, which fund is hereby created; and

Fees paid by other public utilities to the public utilities commission fixed utility fund, which fund is hereby created.

With regard only to expenditures from the public utilities commission fixed utility fund created in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the administrative expenses, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars annually, incurred by the Colorado electric transmission authority in carrying out its duties under article 42 of this title 40. The Colorado electric transmission authority shall remit to the fixed utility fund any amounts it receives in excess of its actual administrative expenses plus a fifteen percent reserve margin.

Money in the funds created in subsection (1) of this section shall be expended only to defray the full amount determined by the general assembly for:

(I) The administrative expenses of the commission for the supervision and regulation of the public utilities paying the fees;

(II) The financing of the office of the utility consumer advocate created in article 6.5 of this title 40; and

The state treasurer shall retain any unexpended balance remaining in either fund at the end of any fiscal year to defray the administrative expenses of the commission during subsequent fiscal years, and the executive director of the department of revenue shall take any such unexpended balance into account when computing the percentage upon which fees for the ensuing fiscal year will be based.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 697, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 115-2-15.

L. 57:

p. 600, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-2-15.

L. 64:

p. 654, § 10.

L. 69:

p. 930, § 11.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 1047, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1372), ch. 247, p. 907, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1186), ch. 212, p. 820, § 1, effective June 6; (1)(a) amended, (SB 16-087), ch. 217, p. 831, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-072), ch. 329, p. 2128, § 10, effective June 24; (2) amended, (SB 21-103), ch. 477, p. 3413, § 11, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2) by SB 21-072 and SB 21-103 were harmonized.